Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.48.110

Defacing a state monument.

(1) A person is guilty of defacing a state monument if he or she knowingly defaces a monument or memorial on the state capitol campus or other state property.

(2) Defacing a state monument is a misdemeanor.

[ 1995 c 66 s 1.]